Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-377
Subdivisions; comprehensive plan; standards; county board prescribe.

The county board shall also have authority to provide for a comprehensive plan for the area within the zoning and subdivision jurisdiction of the county, to be the general plan for the improvement and development of such area, and to prescribe standards for laying out subdivisions in harmony with such comprehensive plan.

Laws 1961, c. 94, § 6, p. 322.